Vermont, session 2025-2026, H90.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5828b is amended to read:
§ 5828b. EARNED INCOME TAX CREDIT
(a)(1) A resident individual or part-year resident individual who is entitled
to an earned income tax credit granted under the laws of the United States or
who would have been entitled to an earned income tax credit under the laws of
the United States but for the fact that the individual, the individual’s spouse, or
one or more of the individual’s children does not have a qualifying taxpayer
VT LEG #379473 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.90
2025 Page 2 of 3
identification number shall be entitled to a credit against the tax imposed for
each year by section 5822 of this title. The credit shall be 38 percent a
percentage, as determined under subdivision (2) of this subsection, of the
earned income tax credit granted to the individual under the laws of the United
States or that would have been granted to the individual under the laws of the
United States but for the fact that the individual, the individual’s spouse, or one
or more of the individual’s children does not have a qualifying taxpayer
identification number, multiplied by the percentage that the individual’s
income that is earned or received during the period of the individual’s
residency in this State bears to the individual’s total income.
(2) The credit under this section shall be a percentage of the earned
income tax credit granted to the individual under the laws of the United States
as follows:
(A) for an individual who claims one qualifying child or more than
one qualifying child for purposes of the earned income tax credit under this
section during the taxable year, 55 percent; and
(B) for an individual who does not claim any qualifying children for
purposes of the earned income tax credit under this section during the taxable
year, 100 percent.
* * *
VT LEG #379473 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.90
2025 Page 3 of 3
(c) Notwithstanding sections 3112 and 5891 and chapter 151, subchapter
12 of this title and any other provision of law to the contrary, the credit under
this section shall not be subject to tax debt setoff under the laws of this State or
another state.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5830f is amended to read:
§ 5830f. VERMONT CHILD TAX CREDIT
* * *
(e) Notwithstanding sections 3112 and 5891 and chapter 151, subchapter
12 of this title and any other provision of law to the contrary, the credit under
this section shall not be subject to tax debt setoff under the laws of this State or
another state.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this act shall take effect retroactively on
January 1, 2025 and shall apply to taxable years beginning on and after
January 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379473 v.1